src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON NUM_VIIZI !!≈ @CODE@ viizi:viid
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^D2Z%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@e%^WGStemt NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE !!≈ @CODE@ kymmene:kymmen
:%{front%} NUM_KYMMENE_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE_01 !!≈ @CODE@ kymmene:kymmen
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_dy ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@et0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii0 NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMEN_COMPOUND !
:%{front%} NUM_KYMMEN_01_COMPOUND ;
LEXICON NUM_KYMMEN_01_COMPOUND ! kaksikymmen
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_dy ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@et0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii0 NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME !!≈ @CODE@ 
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@et NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@a ORD_01_BACK ;

!LEXICON QNT_
!+TYÄ+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON ORD_
+TYÄ+Ord: # ;

LEXICON ORD_TOINE !!≈ @CODE@ toine:to
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@+Ord:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@%{back%}0 NMN_TOINE ;


LEXICON ORD_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
+Ord:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON ORD_LIYGILÄINE !!≈ @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@+Ord:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@%{front%}0 NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON ORD_01_BACK
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>s0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;

LEXICON ORD_01_FRONT
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>s0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-WEAK
 NUM-ABE ;
 NUM-ABL ;
 NUM-ADE ;
 NUM-ALL ;
 NUM-ELA ;
 NUM-ESS ;
 NUM-GEN ;
 NUM-INE ;
 NUM-PRL ;
 NUM-TRA ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-STRONG
 NUM-ILL ;
 NUM-TER ;

LEXICON NUM-ABE
@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>tt%{aä%}h SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ABE@:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>t%{aä%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>tt%{aä%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ABL
@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>lpäi NO-SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.ABL@:@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>l SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ADE
@U.DECL-CX.ADE@:@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>l SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ALL
@U.DECL-CX.ALL@:@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>le SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-GEN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n NUM_CARD_END_NB ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ACC@:@U.DECL-CX.ACC@%>n NUM_CARD_END_NB ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>nke NUM_CARD_END_NB ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} NUM_CARD_END_NB ;
@U.DECL-CX.INS@:@U.DECL-CX.INS@%>n NUM_CARD_END_NB ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_EN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>en SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>enke SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ell%{uy%}%{oö%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_N
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>nke SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ELA
@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>späi NUM_CARD_END_NB ;
@U.DECL-CX.ELA@:@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>s SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ESS
@U.DECL-CX.ESS@:@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>nn%{uy%} NUM_CARD_END_NB  ;
@U.DECL-CX.ESS@:@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>nn%{uy%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-GEN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ILL
@U.DECL-CX.ILL@:@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>h SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-INE
@U.DECL-CX.INE@:@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>s SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
